Utah statutes.
67-3-2.   Right to compel accounting by, and state accounts with, all
collectors of state moneys -- Escheats.
Whenever any person has received moneys, or has money or other personal
property which belongs to the state by escheat or otherwise, or has been
entrusted with the collection, management or disbursement of any moneys,
bonds, or interest accruing thereon, belonging to or held in trust by the
state, and fails to render an account thereof to and make settlement with the
state auditor within the time prescribed by law, or, when no particular time
is specified, fails to render such account and make settlement, or who fails
to pay into the state treasury any moneys belonging to the state, upon being
required so to do by the state auditor, within twenty days after such
requisition, the state auditor must state an account with such person,
charging twenty-five per cent damages, and interest at the rate of ten per
cent per annum from the time of failure; a copy of such account in any suit
thereon shall be prima facie evidence of the things therein stated. In case
the state auditor cannot, for want of information, state such an account, he
may in any action brought by him aver the fact, and allege generally the
amount of money or other property which is due to or which belongs to the
state.
